Utah statutes.
76-8-301.5.   Failure to disclose identity.
(1)  A person is guilty of failure to disclose identity if during the period
of time that the person is lawfully subjected to a stop as described in
Section 77-7-15:
(a)  a peace officer demands that the person disclose the person's name;
(b)  the demand described in Subsection (1)(a) is reasonably related to the
circumstances justifying the stop;
(c)  the disclosure of the person's name by the person does not present a
reasonable danger of self-incrimination in the commission of a crime; and
(d)  the person fails to disclose the person's name.
(2)  Failure to disclose identity is a class B misdemeanor.
